Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,116
Personal-use dealer license plates; fee.

(1) Any licensed dealer or manufacturer may, upon payment of an annual fee of two hundred fifty dollars, make an application, on a form approved by the Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Board, to the county treasurer of the county in which his or her place of business is located for a certificate and one personal-use dealer license plate for the type of motor vehicle or trailer the dealer has been authorized by the Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Board to sell and demonstrate. Additional personal-use dealer license plates may be procured upon payment of an annual fee of two hundred fifty dollars each, subject to the same limitations as provided in section 60-3,114 as to the number of additional dealer license plates. A personal-use dealer license plate may be displayed on a motor vehicle having a gross weight including any load of six thousand pounds or less belonging to the dealer, may be used in the same manner as a dealer license plate, and may be used for personal or private use of the dealer, the dealer's immediate family, or any bona fide employee of the dealer.

(2) Personal-use dealer license plates shall have the same design and shall be displayed as provided in sections 60-370 and 60-3,100.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 116;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 11;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 71;

Laws 2017, LB346, § 2.